South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3448.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Subarticle IV, Article 1, Chapter 40, Title 27 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 27-40-350. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a landlord is prohibited from taking photographs of a tenant's personal belongings while in the rental property without the tenant's express permission. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----